District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Personal Property Tax Simplification Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Chapter 15 of Title 47 of the District of Columbia Official Code is amended as
follows:
(a) D.C. Official Code § 47-1522(a) is amended to read as follows:


“(a) Each year the District shall levy a tax against every person on the tangible personal
property owned or held in trust in that person’s trade or business in the District. The rate of tax
shall be as follows:
“(1) For tax years ending before June 30, 2025, the rate of tax shall be $3.40 for
each $100 of value of the taxable personal property, in excess of $225,000 in value;
“(2) For the tax year beginning on July 1, 2026, the rate of tax shall be $3.40 for
each $100 of value of the taxable personal property, in excess of $325,000 in value; and
“(3) For each tax year thereafter, the rate of tax shall be $3.40 for each $100 of
value of the taxable personal property, in excess of $325,000 multiplied by the percentage that the
local Consumer Price Index as defined in § 47-1807.14(2), has risen during the calendar year in
which the tax year began, rounded to the nearest whole dollar.”.
(b) D.C. Official Code § 47-1523(a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) The full and true value and the current value of tangible personal property, including
taxable leasehold improvements, having a taxable situs in the District shall be reported on the
return if, for the tax year, the value exceeds the threshold for taxation under § 47-1522. The full
and true value shall be the original costs of the tangible personal property in an arms-length
transaction, computed as of July 1st of the tax year. The current value of the tangible personal
property shall be the full and true value less a reasonable allowance for straight line depreciation
in accordance with rules promulgated by the Mayor and the provisions under subsections (b), (c),
(d), and (e) of this section. Tangible personal property items with a useful life of one year or less
shall be reported at cost. No proration of value shall be permitted in anticipation of the
disposition of an item of tangible personal property. In no event shall the current value reported


be less than 25% of the original cost or exchange value of the tangible personal property, except
as permitted under subsection (b) of this section.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).